Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.370

Mandatory insurance protection for employees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after August 9, 1971 boards of directors of all school districts shall provide their employees with insurance protection covering those employees while engaged in the maintenance of order and discipline and the protection of school personnel and students and the property thereof when that is deemed necessary by such employees. Such insurance protection must include as a minimum, liability insurance covering injury to persons and property, and insurance protecting those employees from loss or damage of their personal property incurred while so engaged.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 269 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.425.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 269: See note following RCW 28A.400.350.